Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-2436
Permit; period valid; fee; renewal; fee; notice of expiration.

(1) A permit to carry a concealed handgun is valid throughout the state for a period of five years after the date of issuance. The fee for issuing a permit is one hundred dollars.

(2) The Nebraska State Patrol shall renew a permitholder's permit to carry a concealed handgun for a renewal period of five years, subject to continuing compliance with the requirements of section 69-2433, except as provided in subsection (2) of section 69-2443. The renewal fee is fifty dollars, and renewal may be applied for no earlier than four months before expiration of the permit and no later than thirty business days after the date of expiration of the permit. At least four months before expiration of a permit to carry a concealed handgun, the Nebraska State Patrol shall send to the permitholder by United States mail or electronically notice of expiration of the permit.

(3) The applicant shall submit the fee with the application to the Nebraska State Patrol. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska State Patrol Cash Fund.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB322, § 17;

Laws 2012, LB807, § 4;

Laws 2021, LB236, § 4;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 18.